Utah statutes.
61-2g-310.   Reciprocal licensure.

An applicant for licensure or certification in this state who is licensed or certified under the laws of any other state, territory, or district may obtain a license or certification in this state upon the terms and conditions determined by the division and the board, if, in the determination of the division and the board:

(1)  the state, territory, or the District of Columbia is considered to have substantially equivalent licensing laws for real estate appraisers;

(2)  the laws of that state, territory, or the District of Columbia accord substantially equal reciprocal rights to a person licensed or certified and in good standing in this state; and

(3)  no formal charges alleging violation of state appraisal licensing or certification laws have been filed against the applicant by the applicant's state of domicile.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

